Massachusetts, session 194th, H2178.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 27H of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 1 and 2, the words “the cleaning and 
maintenance of” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- cleaning and maintenance 
or security guard services in. 
SECTION 2. Said section 27H of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by striking out, in line 6, the words “maintenance or cleaning” and inserting in place 
thereof the following words:- cleaning and maintenance or security guard.